Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-649
Rules and regulations.

The Chief Water Officer may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary or desirable to secure compliance with the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 12, p. 832;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 186;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 186.